Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 2 EQUIPMENT
42-4-225. Mufflers - prevention of noise.

Every motor vehicle subject to registration and operated on a highway shall at all times be equipped with an adequate muffler in constant operation and properly maintained to prevent any excessive or unusual noise, and no such muffler or exhaust system shall be equipped with a cut-off, bypass, or similar device. No person shall modify the exhaust system of a motor vehicle in a manner which will amplify or increase the noise emitted by the motor of such vehicle above that emitted by the muffler originally installed on the vehicle, and such original muffler shall comply with all of the requirements of this section.

(1.5) Any commercial vehicle, as defined in section 42-4-235 (1)(a), subject to registration and operated on a highway, that is equipped with an engine compression brake device is required to have a muffler.

A muffler is a device consisting of a series of chamber or baffle plates or other mechanical design for the purpose of receiving exhaust gas from an internal combustion engine and effective in reducing noise.

Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section commits a class B traffic infraction. Any person who violates subsection (1.5) of this section shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of five hundred dollars. Fifty percent of any fine for a violation of subsection (1.5) of this section occurring within the corporate limits of a city or town, or within the unincorporated area of a county, shall be transmitted to the treasurer or chief financial officer of said city, town, or county, and the remaining fifty percent shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, credited to the highway users tax fund, and allocated and expended as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(a), C.R.S.

This section shall not apply to electric motor vehicles.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2260, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(4) added, p. 393, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2000:

(1.5) added and (3) amended, p. 1100, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2005:

(3) amended, p. 149, § 26, effective April 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-222 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-225 was relocated to § 42-4-228.

42-4-226. Mirrors - exterior placements.

Every motor vehicle shall be equipped with a mirror or mirrors so located and so constructed as to reflect to the driver a free and unobstructed view of the highway for a distance of at least two hundred feet to the rear of such vehicle.

Whenever any motor vehicle is not equipped with a rear window and rear side windows or has a rear window and rear side windows composed of, covered by, or treated with any material or component that, when viewed from the position of the driver, obstructs the rear view of the driver or makes such window or windows nontransparent, or whenever any motor vehicle is towing another vehicle or trailer or carrying any load or cargo or object that obstructs the rear view of the driver, such vehicle shall be equipped with an exterior mirror on each side so located with respect to the position of the driver as to comply with the visual requirement of subsection (1) of this section.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2261, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 393, § 5, effective August 6.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (SB 09-075), ch. 418, p. 2324, § 12, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-223 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-226 was relocated to § 42-4-229.

42-4-227. Windows unobstructed - certain materials prohibited - windshield wiper requirements.

Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (a), no person shall operate a motor vehicle registered in Colorado on which any window, except the windshield, is composed of, covered by, or treated with any material or component that presents an opaque, nontransparent, or metallic or mirrored appearance in such a way that it allows less than twenty-seven percent light transmittance. The windshield shall allow at least seventy percent light transmittance.
(1) (a) (I) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (a), no person shall operate a motor vehicle registered in Colorado on which any window, except the windshield, is composed of, covered by, or treated with any material or component that presents an opaque, nontransparent, or metallic or mirrored appearance in such a way that it allows less than twenty-seven percent light transmittance. The windshield shall allow at least seventy percent light transmittance.

Notwithstanding subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a), the windows to the rear of the driver, including the rear window, may allow less than twenty-seven percent light transmittance if the front side windows and the windshield on such vehicles allow at least seventy percent light transmittance.

A law enforcement vehicle may have its windows, except the windshield, treated in such a manner so as to allow less than twenty-seven percent light transmittance only for the purpose of providing a valid law enforcement service. A law enforcement vehicle with such window treatment shall not be used for any traffic law enforcement operations, including operations concerning any offense in this article. For purposes of this subparagraph (III), "law enforcement vehicle" means a vehicle owned or leased by a state or local law enforcement agency. The treatment of the windshield of a law enforcement vehicle is subject to the limits described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1).

Notwithstanding any provision of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), nontransparent material may be applied, installed, or affixed to the topmost portion of the windshield subject to the following:

The bottom edge of the material extends no more than four inches measured from the top of the windshield down;

The material is not red or amber in color, nor does it affect perception of primary colors or otherwise distort vision or contain lettering that distorts or obstructs vision;

The material does not reflect sunlight or headlight glare into the eyes of occupants of oncoming or preceding vehicles to any greater extent than the windshield without the material.

Nothing in this subsection (1) shall be construed to prevent the use of any window which is composed of, covered by, or treated with any material or component in a manner approved by federal statute or regulation if such window was included as a component part of a vehicle at the time of the vehicle manufacture, or the replacement of any such window by such covering which meets such guidelines.

No material shall be used on any window in the motor vehicle that presents a metallic or mirrored appearance.

Nothing in this subsection (1) shall be construed to deny or prevent the use of certificates or other papers which do not obstruct the view of the driver and which may be required by law to be displayed.

The windshield on every motor vehicle shall be equipped with a device for cleaning rain, snow, or other moisture from the windshield, which device shall be so constructed as to be controlled or operated by the driver of the vehicle.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Any person who installs, covers, or treats a windshield or window so that the windshield or window does not meet the requirements of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars.

This section shall apply to all motor vehicles; except that subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to low-speed electric vehicles.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2261, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 952, § 6, effective May 25.

L. 2009:

(4) amended, (SB 09-075), ch. 418, p. 2324, § 13, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 11-1251), ch. 143, p. 499, § 1, effective May 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-224 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-227 was relocated to § 42-4-230.

42-4-228. Restrictions on tire equipment.

Every solid rubber tire on a vehicle shall have rubber on its entire traction surface at least one inch thick above the edge of the flange of the entire periphery.

No person shall operate or move on any highway any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer having any metal tire in contact with the roadway, and it is unlawful to operate upon the highways of this state any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer equipped with solid rubber tires.

No tire on a vehicle moved on a highway shall have on its periphery any block, stud, flange, cleat, or spike or any other protuberances of any material other than rubber which projects beyond the tread on the traction surface of the tire; except that, on single-tired passenger vehicles and on other single-tired vehicles with rated capacities up to and including three-fourths ton, it shall be permissible to use tires containing studs or other protuberances which do not project more than one-sixteenth of an inch beyond the tread of the traction surface of the tire; and except that it shall be permissible to use farm machinery with tires having protuberances which will not injure the highway; and except also that it shall be permissible to use tire chains of reasonable proportions upon any vehicle when required for safety because of snow, ice, or other conditions tending to cause a vehicle to skid.

The department of transportation and local authorities in their respective jurisdictions, in their discretion, may issue special permits authorizing the operation upon a highway of traction engines or tractors having movable tracks with transverse corrugations upon the periphery of such movable tracks or farm tractors or other farm machinery, the operation of which upon a highway would otherwise be prohibited under this article.

No person shall drive or move a motor vehicle on any highway unless such vehicle is equipped with tires in safe operating condition in accordance with this subsection (5) and any supplemental rules and regulations promulgated by the executive director of the department.

The executive director of the department shall promulgate such rules as the executive director deems necessary setting forth requirements of safe operating conditions for tires. These rules shall be utilized by law enforcement officers for visual inspection of tires and shall include methods for simple gauge measurement of tire tread depth.

A tire shall be considered unsafe if it has:

Any bump, bulge, or knot affecting the tire structure;

A break which exposes a tire body cord or is repaired with a boot or patch;

A tread depth of less than two thirty-seconds of an inch measured in any two tread grooves at three locations equally spaced around the circumference of the tire, or, on those tires with tread wear indicators, a tire shall be considered unsafe if it is worn to the point that the tread wear indicators contact the road in any two-tread grooves at three locations equally spaced around the circumference of the tire; except that this subparagraph (III) shall not apply to tires on a commercial vehicle as such term is defined in section 42-4-235 (1)(a); or

Such other conditions as may be reasonably demonstrated to render it unsafe.

No passenger car tire shall be used on any motor vehicle which is driven or moved on any highway if such tire was designed or manufactured for nonhighway use.

No person shall sell any motor vehicle for highway use unless the vehicle is equipped with tires that are in compliance with subsections (5) and (6) of this section and any rules of safe operating condition promulgated by the department.

Any person who violates any provision of subsection (1), (2), (3), (5), or (6) of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Any person who violates any provision of subsection (7) of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2262, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-225 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For the penalty for class 2 misdemeanor traffic offenses, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(II).

42-4-229. Safety glazing material in motor vehicles.

No person shall sell any new motor vehicle, nor shall any new motor vehicle be registered, unless such vehicle is equipped with safety glazing material of a type approved by the department for any required front windshield and wherever glazing material is used in doors and windows of said motor vehicle. This section shall apply to all passenger-type motor vehicles, including passenger buses and school vehicles, but, in respect to camper coaches and trucks, including truck tractors, the requirements as to safety glazing material shall apply only to all glazing material used in required front windshields and that used in doors and windows in the drivers' compartments and such other compartments as are lawfully occupied by passengers in said vehicles.

The term "safety glazing materials" means such glazing materials as will reduce substantially, in comparison with ordinary sheet glass or plate glass, the likelihood of injury to persons by objects from exterior sources or by these safety glazing materials when they may be cracked or broken.

The department shall compile and publish a list of types of glazing material by name approved by it as meeting the requirements of this section, and the department shall not, after January 1, 1958, register any motor vehicle which is subject to the provisions of this section unless it is equipped with an approved type of safety glazing material, and the department shall suspend the registration of any motor vehicle subject to this section which is found to be not so equipped until it is made to conform to the requirements of this section.

A person shall not operate a motor vehicle on a highway unless the vehicle is equipped with a front windshield as provided in this section, except as provided in section 42-4-232 (1) and except for motor vehicles registered as collector's items under section 42-12-301 or 42-12-302.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2264, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2005:

(4) amended, p. 1173, § 10, effective August 8.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1232), ch. 163, p. 573, § 12, effective April 28.

L. 2011:

(4) amended, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 245, § 7, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-226 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-229 was relocated to § 42-4-231.

42-4-230. Emergency lighting equipment - who must carry.

No motor vehicle carrying a truck license and weighing six thousand pounds or more and no passenger bus shall be operated over the highways of this state at any time without carrying in an accessible place inside or on the outside of the vehicle three bidirectional emergency reflective triangles of a type approved by the department, but the use of such equipment is not required in municipalities where there are street lights within not more than one hundred feet.

Whenever a motor vehicle referred to in subsection (1) of this section is stopped upon the traveled portion of a highway or the shoulder of a highway for any cause other than necessary traffic stops, the driver of the stopped motor vehicle shall immediately activate the vehicular hazard warning signal flashers and continue the flashing until the driver places the bidirectional emergency reflective triangles as directed in subsection (3) of this section.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, whenever a motor vehicle referred to in subsection (1) of this section is stopped upon the traveled portion of a highway or the shoulder of a highway for any cause other than necessary traffic stops, the driver shall, as soon as possible, but in any event within ten minutes, place the bidirectional emergency reflective triangles in the following manner:

One at the traffic side of the stopped vehicle, within ten feet of the front or rear of the vehicle;

One at a distance of approximately one hundred feet from the stopped vehicle in the center of the traffic lane or shoulder occupied by the vehicle and in the direction toward traffic approaching in that lane; and

One at a distance of approximately one hundred feet from the stopped vehicle in the opposite direction from those placed in accordance with paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (3) in the center of the traffic lane or shoulder occupied by the vehicle; or

If the vehicle is stopped within five hundred feet of a curve, crest of a hill, or other obstruction to view, the driver shall place the emergency equipment required by this subsection (3) in the direction of the obstruction to view at a distance of one hundred feet to five hundred feet from the stopped vehicle so as to afford ample warning to other users of the highway; or

If the vehicle is stopped upon the traveled portion or the shoulder of a divided or one-way highway, the driver shall place the emergency equipment required by this subsection (3), one at a distance of two hundred feet and one at a distance of one hundred feet in a direction toward approaching traffic in the center of the lane or shoulder occupied by the vehicle, and one at the traffic side of the vehicle within ten feet of the rear of the vehicle.

No motor vehicle operating as a tow truck, as defined in section 40-10.1-101 (21), C.R.S., at the scene of an accident shall move or attempt to move any wrecked vehicle without first complying with those sections of the law concerning emergency lighting.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2265, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2013:

(4) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1709, § 137, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-227 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-231. Parking lights.

When lighted lamps are required by section 42-4-204, no vehicle shall be driven upon a highway with the parking lights lighted except when the lights are being used as signal lamps and except when the head lamps are lighted at the same time. Parking lights are those lights permitted by section 42-4-215 and any other lights mounted on the front of the vehicle, designed to be displayed primarily when the vehicle is parked. Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2266, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-229 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-231 was relocated to § 42-4-232.

42-4-232. Minimum safety standards for motorcycles and low-power scooters.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), a person shall not drive a motorcycle or low-power scooter on a public highway unless the person and any passenger thereon is wearing goggles or eyeglasses with lenses made of safety glass or plastic; except that this subsection (1) does not apply to a person wearing a helmet containing eye protection made of safety glass or plastic.

A person driving or riding a motorcycle need not wear eye protection if the motorcycle has:

Three wheels;

A maximum design speed of twenty-five miles per hour or less;

A windshield; and

Seat belts.

The department shall adopt standards and specifications for the design of goggles and eyeglasses.

Any motorcycle carrying a passenger, other than in a sidecar or enclosed cab, shall be equipped with footrests for such passengers.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2266, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1276, § 48, effective October 1.

L. 2015:

(1) amended, (HB 15-1345), ch. 330, p. 1347, § 2, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-231 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-232 was relocated to § 42-4-233.

Cross references:

For regulation of motorcycles generally, see part 15 of this article.

42-4-233. Alteration of suspension system.

No person shall operate a motor vehicle of a type required to be registered under the laws of this state upon a public highway with either the rear or front suspension system altered or changed from the manufacturer's original design except in accordance with specifications permitting such alteration established by the department. Nothing contained in this section shall prevent the installation of manufactured heavy-duty equipment to include shock absorbers and overload springs, nor shall anything contained in this section prevent a person from operating a motor vehicle on a public highway with normal wear of the suspension system if normal wear shall not affect the control of the vehicle.

This section shall not apply to motor vehicles designed or modified primarily for off-highway racing purposes, and such motor vehicles may be lawfully towed on the highways of this state.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2267, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-232 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-233 was relocated to § 42-4-234.

Cross references:

For the penalty for class 2 misdemeanor traffic offenses, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(II).

42-4-234. Slow-moving vehicles - display of emblem.

All machinery, equipment, and vehicles, except bicycles, electrical assisted bicycles, electric scooters, and other human-powered vehicles, designed to operate or normally operated at a speed of less than twenty-five miles per hour on a public highway must display a triangular slow-moving vehicle emblem on the rear.

The department shall set standards for a triangular slow-moving emblem for use on low-speed electric vehicles.

Bicycles, electrical assisted bicycles, electric scooters, and other human-powered vehicles may, but need not, display the emblem specified in this subsection (1).

The executive director of the department shall adopt standards and specifications for such emblem, position of the mounting thereof, and requirements for certification of conformance with the standards and specifications adopted by the American society of agricultural engineers concerning such emblems. The requirements of such emblem shall be in addition to any lighting device required by law.

The use of the emblem required under this section shall be restricted to the use specified in subsection (1) of this section, and its use on any other type of vehicle or stationary object shall be prohibited.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2267, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 393, § 6, effective August 6.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-075), ch. 418, p. 2324, § 14, effective August 5; (1) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1276, § 49, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(1)(a) and (1)(c) amended, (HB 19-1221), ch. 271, p. 2560, § 7, effective May 23.

42-4-235. Minimum standards for commercial vehicles - motor carrier safety fund - created - definitions - rules.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Commercial vehicle" means:

A self-propelled or towed vehicle:

Bearing an apportioned plate;

Having a manufacturer's gross vehicle weight rating or gross combination rating of at least sixteen thousand one pounds and used in commerce on public highways; or

Having a manufacturer's gross vehicle weight rating or gross combination rating of at least sixteen thousand one pounds and used to transport sixteen or more passengers, including the driver, unless the vehicle is a school bus regulated in accordance with section 42-4-1904 or a vehicle that does not have a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand one or more pounds and that is owned or operated by a school district so long as the school district does not receive remuneration, other than reimbursement of the school district's costs, for the use of the vehicle;

Any motor vehicle designed or equipped to transport other motor vehicles from place to place by means of winches, cables, pulleys, or other equipment for towing, pulling, or lifting, when such motor vehicle is used in commerce on the public highways of this state; and

A motor vehicle that is used on the public highways and transports materials determined by the secretary of transportation to be hazardous under 49 U.S.C. sec. 5103 in such quantities as to require placarding under 49 CFR parts 172 and 173.

Repealed.

"Motor carrier" means every person, lessee, receiver, or trustee appointed by any court whatsoever owning, controlling, operating, or managing any commercial vehicle as defined in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1).

No person shall operate a commercial vehicle, as defined in subsection (1) of this section, on any public highway of this state unless such vehicle is in compliance with the rules adopted by the chief of the Colorado state patrol pursuant to subsection (4) of this section. Any person who violates the rules, including any intrastate motor carrier, shall be subject to the civil penalties authorized pursuant to 49 CFR part 386, subpart G, as such subpart existed on October 1, 2001. Persons who utilize an independent contractor shall not be liable for penalties imposed on the independent contractor for equipment, acts, and omissions within the independent contractor's control or supervision. All civil penalties collected pursuant to this article by a state agency or by a court shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit them to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S., for allocation and expenditure as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(a), C.R.S.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection (2):

Intrastate motor carriers shall not be subject to any provisions in 49 CFR, part 386, subpart G that relate the amount of a penalty to a violator's ability to pay, and such penalties shall be based upon the nature and gravity of the violation, the degree of culpability, and such other matters as justice and public safety may require;

When determining the assessment of a civil penalty for safety violations, the period of a motor carrier's safety compliance history that a compliance review officer may consider shall not exceed three years;

The intrastate operation of implements of husbandry shall not be subject to the civil penalties provided in 49 CFR, part 386, subpart G. Nothing in this subsection (2) shall be construed to repeal, preempt, or negate any existing regulatory exemption for agricultural operations, intrastate farm vehicle drivers, intrastate vehicles or combinations of vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating of not more than twenty-six thousand pounds that do not require a commercial driver's license to operate, or any successor or analogous agricultural exemptions, whether based on federal or state law.

This section does not apply to a motor vehicle or motor vehicle and trailer combination:

With a gross vehicle weight, gross vehicle weight rating, or gross combination rating of less than twenty-six thousand one pounds;

Not operated in interstate commerce;

Not transporting hazardous materials requiring placarding;

Not transporting either sixteen or more passengers including the driver or eight or more passengers for compensation; and

If the motor vehicle or combination is being used solely for agricultural purposes.

The Colorado state patrol shall have exclusive enforcement authority to conduct safety compliance reviews, as defined in 49 CFR 385.3, as such section existed on October 1, 2001, and to impose civil penalties pursuant to such reviews. Nothing in this paragraph (c) shall expand or limit the ability of local governments to conduct roadside safety inspections.

Upon notice from the Colorado state patrol, the department shall, pursuant to section 42-3-120, cancel the registration of a motor carrier who fails to pay in full a civil penalty imposed pursuant to this subsection (2) within thirty days after notification of the penalty.

Repealed.

Any motor carrier operating a commercial vehicle within Colorado must declare knowledge of the rules adopted by the chief of the Colorado state patrol pursuant to subsection (4) of this section. The declaration of knowledge shall be in writing on a form provided by the Colorado state patrol. The form must be signed and returned by a motor carrier according to rules adopted by the chief.

Except as described in subsection (4)(a)(III) of this section, the chief of the Colorado state patrol shall adopt rules for the operation of all commercial vehicles and, as specified in subsection (4)(a)(II) of this section, vehicles that would be commercial vehicles but for the fact that they have a manufacturer's gross vehicle weight rating or gross combination rating of ten thousand one pounds or more but not more than sixteen thousand pounds. In adopting the rules, the chief shall use as general guidelines the standards contained in the current rules and regulations of the United States department of transportation relating to safety regulations, qualifications of drivers, driving of motor vehicles, parts and accessories, notification and reporting of accidents, hours of service of drivers, inspection, repair and maintenance of motor vehicles, financial responsibility, insurance, and employee safety and health standards; except that rules regarding financial responsibility and insurance do not apply to a commercial vehicle as defined in subsection (1) of this section that is also subject to regulation by the public utilities commission under article 10.1 of title 40. On and after September 1, 2003, all commercial vehicle safety inspections conducted to determine compliance with rules promulgated by the chief pursuant to this subsection (4)(a) must be performed by an enforcement official, as defined in section 42-20-103 (2), who has been certified by the commercial vehicle safety alliance, or any successor organization thereto, to perform level I inspections.
(4) (a) (I) Except as described in subsection (4)(a)(III) of this section, the chief of the Colorado state patrol shall adopt rules for the operation of all commercial vehicles and, as specified in subsection (4)(a)(II) of this section, vehicles that would be commercial vehicles but for the fact that they have a manufacturer's gross vehicle weight rating or gross combination rating of ten thousand one pounds or more but not more than sixteen thousand pounds. In adopting the rules, the chief shall use as general guidelines the standards contained in the current rules and regulations of the United States department of transportation relating to safety regulations, qualifications of drivers, driving of motor vehicles, parts and accessories, notification and reporting of accidents, hours of service of drivers, inspection, repair and maintenance of motor vehicles, financial responsibility, insurance, and employee safety and health standards; except that rules regarding financial responsibility and insurance do not apply to a commercial vehicle as defined in subsection (1) of this section that is also subject to regulation by the public utilities commission under article 10.1 of title 40. On and after September 1, 2003, all commercial vehicle safety inspections conducted to determine compliance with rules promulgated by the chief pursuant to this subsection (4)(a) must be performed by an enforcement official, as defined in section 42-20-103 (2), who has been certified by the commercial vehicle safety alliance, or any successor organization thereto, to perform level I inspections.

With respect to the operation of all vehicles that would be commercial vehicles but for the fact that they have a manufacturer's gross vehicle weight rating or gross combination rating of ten thousand one pounds or more but not more than sixteen thousand pounds, the chief of the Colorado state patrol may adopt rules that authorize the Colorado state patrol to:

Annually inspect these vehicles;

Enforce with respect to these vehicles all requirements for the securing of loads that apply to commercial vehicles; and

Enforce with respect to these vehicles all requirements relating to the use of coupling devices for commercial vehicles.

Rules establishing insurance requirements for vehicles used by licensed river outfitters are established by the parks and wildlife commission pursuant to section 33-32-103 (1)(e).

The Colorado public utilities commission may enforce safety rules of the chief of the Colorado state patrol governing commercial vehicles described in subparagraphs (I) and (II) of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section pursuant to his or her authority to regulate motor carriers as defined in section 40-10.1-101, C.R.S., including the issuance of civil penalties for violations of the rules as provided in section 40-7-113, C.R.S.

Any person who violates a rule promulgated by the chief of the Colorado state patrol pursuant to this section or fails to comply with subsection (3) of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

The motor carrier safety fund is created in the state treasury. The fund consists of moneys transferred from the public utilities commission motor carrier fund pursuant to section 40-2-110.5 (9)(a), C.R.S. Moneys in the fund are subject to appropriation by the general assembly for the direct and indirect costs of the advancement of highway safety relating to commercial carrier operations pursuant to this section. All interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund are credited to the fund, and any moneys not appropriated remain in the fund and do not transfer or revert to the general fund or any other fund.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2267, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(1)(a) and (4) amended, p. 1548, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 292, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 284, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 2003:

(4)(a) amended, p. 664, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

(2)(a) amended, p. 149, § 27, effective April 5.

L. 2006:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1063, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2)(d) added, p. 857, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(4)(a) amended, (HB 09-1244), ch. 430, p. 2392, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(4) amended, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 425, § 26, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(1)(b) repealed and (2)(a), (2)(d)(I), (3), (4), and (5) amended, (HB 12-1019), ch. 135, p. 466, § 9, effective July 1; (2)(b)(IV) added, (SB 12-059), ch. 116, p. 397, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2014:

(6) added, (HB 14-1081), ch. 8, p. 90, § 2, effective February 27.

L. 2017:

(1)(a)(I) and (4)(a) amended, (HB 17-1061), ch. 55, p. 174, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 2019:

(4)(a)(I) amended and (4)(a)(III) added, (SB 19-160), ch. 416, p. 3662, § 5, effective August 2.